Washington statutes.
RCW 36.79.130

Recommended budget for expenditures from rural arterial trust account.

Not later than November 1st of each even-numbered year the board shall prepare and present to the office of financial management a recommended budget for expenditures from the rural arterial trust account during the ensuing biennium. The budget shall contain an estimate of the revenues to be credited to the rural arterial trust account.

The office of financial management shall review the budget as recommended, revise the budget as it deems proper, and include the budget as revised as a separate section of the transportation budget which it shall submit to the governor pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW.

[ 2006 c 334 s 12; 1983 1st ex.s. c 49 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 334: See note following RCW 47.01.051.